Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1493XC (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 216.19, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Any complaint filed with a local agency 3 or local commission where a party is a political subdivision 4 shall be referred to the Iowa office of civil rights for 5 processing. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. a. A local agency or local commission 7 complaint, upon request by any party, shall be transferred to 8 the Iowa office of civil rights for processing if the complaint 9 alleges a violation of this chapter and has not been resolved 10 within twelve months of the filing date of the complaint. 11 b. The local agency or local commission shall within three 12 hundred days of the filing date of the complaint do all of the 13 following: 14 (1) Send notice to all parties of a partyâs right to 15 direct transfer of the complaint to the Iowa office of civil 16 rights from the local agency or local commission after twelve 17 months if the complaint alleges a violation of this chapter. 18 The notice shall be sent to all parties by verified mail, 19 or electronic notice if the party is enrolled in electronic 20 notification. 21 (2) Cross file a complaint with the Iowa office of civil 22 rights if the local agency or local commission complaint arises 23 from an alleged violation of a state law, rule, or regulation 24 under the jurisdiction of the Iowa office of civil rights. 25 This subparagraph shall not be construed to prohibit a local 26 agency or local commission from cross filing a complaint with 27 any other federal or state agency, commission, or entity, if 28 the local agency or local commission complaint arises from 29 an alleged violation of a state or federal law, rule, or 30 regulation of a state or federal agency, commission, or entity. 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. The term of a commissioner appointed to 32 a local agency or local commission shall be for two years. 33